Illinois, session 104th, HB3484.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Boat Registration and Safety Act is amended 5by changing Sections 1-2, 2-2, 3-11, 4-2, 4-4, 4-11, 5-13, 65-18, 7-1, and 7-2 and by adding Sections 5-24 and 5-25 as 7follows: 8    (625 ILCS 45/1-2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 311-2)9    Sec. 1-2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 10context clearly requires a different meaning:11    "Airboat" means a vessel that is typically flat-bottomed 12and propelled by an aircraft-type propeller powered by an 13engine.14    "Boating accident" means a collision, accident, or 15casualty involving a vessel in or upon, or entering into or 16exiting from, the water, including capsizing, collision with 17another vessel or object, sinking, personal injury, death, 18disappearance of a person from on board under circumstances 19that indicate the possibility of death or injury, or property 20damage to any vessel or dock. 21    "Competent" means capable of assisting a water skier in 22case of injury or accident.23    "Consideration" means an economic benefit, inducement,   HB3484- 2 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1right, or profit, including pecuniary payment accruing to an 2individual, person, or entity, but not including a voluntary 3sharing of the actual expense of the voyage, by monetary 4contribution or donation of fuel, food, beverage, or other 5supplies. 6    "Dealer" means any person who engages in the business of 7manufacturing, selling, or dealing in, on consignment or 8otherwise, any number of new watercraft or 5 or more used 9watercraft of any make during the year, including any 10off-highway vehicle dealer or snowmobile dealer or a person 11licensed as a new or used vehicle dealer who also sells or 12deals in, on consignment or otherwise, any number of 13watercraft as defined in this Act.14    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.15    "Inland Rules" means the Inland Navigation Rules Act of 161980.17    "International regulations" means the International 18Regulations for Preventing Collisions at Sea, 1972, including 19annexes currently in force for the United States.20    "Leeward side" means the side of a vessel's sail that is 21facing away or sheltered from the wind.22    "Lifeboat" means a small boat kept on board a larger boat 23for use in an emergency.24    "Livery" means a person, corporation, company, business, 25or entity that advertises a livery watercraft for use by 26another, in exchange for any type of consideration and does   HB3484- 3 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1not provide the renter or lessee with a captain, crew, or any 2staff or personnel to operate, oversee, maintain, or manage 3the watercraft. 4    "Motorboat" or "power-driven vessel" means any vessel 5propelled by machinery whether such machinery is a principle 6source of propulsion.7    "Nonpowered watercraft" or "human-powered watercraft" 8means any canoe, kayak, kiteboard, paddleboard, ribbed 9inflatable, or any other watercraft propelled by oars, 10paddles, or poles but not powered by sail, canvas, human body 11part, or machinery of any sort.12    "Operate" means to use, navigate, employ, or otherwise be 13in actual physical control of a motorboat or vessel.14    "Operator" means a person who operates or is in actual 15physical control of a watercraft.16    "Owner" means a person, other than a secured party, having 17property rights or title to a watercraft. "Owner" includes a 18person entitled to the use or possession of a motorboat 19subject to an interest in another person, reserved or created 20by agreement and securing payment of performance of an 21obligation. "Owner" does not include a lessee under a lease 22not intended as security.23    "Passenger" means an individual carried on the vessel. 24"Passenger" does not mean:25        (1) the owner or individual representative of the 26    owner, or in the case of a chartered vessel, an individual   HB3484- 4 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1    charterer or individual representative of the charterer, 2    but in no case shall this exemption found in this 3    paragraph apply to more than one person that is physically 4    present on a vessel at any one time;5        (2) the master; or6        (3) a member of the crew engaged in the business of the 7    vessel who has not contributed consideration for carriage 8    and who is paid for on board services.9    "Passenger for hire" means a passenger for whom 10consideration is contributed as a condition of carriage on the 11vessel. 12    "Person" means any individual, firm, corporation, 13partnership, or association, and any agent, assignee, trustee, 14executor, receiver, or representative thereof.15    "Personal flotation device" or "PFD" means a device that 16is approved by the Commandant, U.S. Coast Guard, under Part 17160 of Title 46 of the Code of Federal Regulations.18    "Personal injury" means any injury requiring treatment 19beyond first aid. 20    "Personal watercraft" means a vessel propelled by a water 21jet pump or other machinery as its primary source of motive 22power and designed to be operated by a person sitting, 23standing, or kneeling on the vessel, rather than within the 24confines of a hull.25    "Principally operated" means the vessel is or will be 26primarily operated within the jurisdiction of the State during   HB3484- 5 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1a calendar year.2    "Recreational boat" means any vessel manufactured or used 3primarily for noncommercial use, or leased, rented, or 4chartered to another for noncommercial use.5    "Sailboat" or "sailing vessel" means any vessel under sail 6so long as the propelling machinery, if fitted, is not being 7used.8    "Seaplane" means any aircraft designed to maneuver on the 9water.10    "Specialty prop-craft" means a vessel that is similar in 11appearance and operation to a personal watercraft but that is 12powered by an outboard or propeller driven motor.13    "Throwable PFD" has the meaning provided in 33 CFR 175.13.14    "Underway" applies to a vessel or watercraft at all times 15except when it is moored at a dock or anchorage area.16    "Use" applies to all vessels on the waters of this State, 17whether moored or underway.18    "Vessel" or "watercraft" means every device or boat 19watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of 20transportation on water, except a seaplane on the water, air 21mattress or similar device, and boats used for concession 22rides in artificial bodies of water designed and used 23exclusively for such concessions.24    "Waters of this State" means any water within the 25jurisdiction of this State.26    "Wearable U.S. Coast Guard approved personal flotation   HB3484- 6 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1device", "wearable U.S. Coast Guard approved PFD", and 2"wearable PFD" have the meaning provided for "wearable PFD" in 333 CFR 175.13.4    "Windward side" means the side of a vessel's sail that has 5the wind blowing into the sail.6    "Wing in Ground" (WIG) vessel means a multimodal vessel 7which, in its main operational mode, flies in close proximity 8to the surface utilizing surface-effect action. 9(Source: P.A. 102-595, eff. 6-1-22.) 10    (625 ILCS 45/2-2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 312-2)11    Sec. 2-2. Inspection; removal; impoundment. 12    (a) Agents of the Department or other duly authorized 13police officers may board and inspect any watercraft boat at 14any time for the purpose of determining if this Act is being 15complied with. If the boarding officer or agent discovers any 16violation of this Act, he may issue a summons to the operator 17of the boat requiring that the operator appear before the 18circuit court for the county within which the offense was 19committed.20    (b) Every watercraft vessel subject to this Act, if under 21way and upon being hailed by a designated law enforcement 22officer, must stop immediately and lay to.23    (c) Agents of the Department and other duly authorized 24police officers may enforce all federal laws and regulations 25which have been mutually agreed upon by the federal and state   HB3484- 7 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1governments and are applicable to the operation of watercraft 2on navigable waters and federal impoundments where concurrent 3jurisdiction exists between the federal and state governments.4    (d) Agents of the Department and other duly authorized 5police officers may seize and impound, at the owner's or 6operator's expense, any watercraft involved in a boating 7accident or a violation of Section 3A-21, 5-1, 5-2, or 5-16 of 8this Act.9    (e) If a watercraft is causing a traffic hazard because of 10its position on a waterway or its physical appearance is 11causing the impeding of traffic, its immediate removal from 12the waterway by a towing service may be authorized by a law 13enforcement agency having jurisdiction.14    (f) Whenever a peace officer reasonably believes that a 15person under arrest for a violation of Section 5-1, 5-2, or 165-16 of this Act or similar provision of a local ordinance, is 17likely, upon release, to commit a subsequent violation of 18Section 5-1, 5-2, or 5-16 or a similar provision of a local 19ordinance, the arresting officer shall have the watercraft 20which the person was operating at the time of the arrest 21impounded for a period of not more than 12 hours after the time 22of the arrest. The watercraft may be released by the arresting 23law enforcement agency without impoundment, or may be released 24prior to the end of the impoundment period, however, if: 25        (1) the watercraft was not owned by the person under 26    arrest, and the lawful owner requesting release possesses   HB3484- 8 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1    proof of ownership, and would not, as determined by the 2    arresting law enforcement agency: (i) indicate a lack of 3    ability to operate a watercraft in a safe manner, or (ii) 4    otherwise, by operating the watercraft, be in violation of 5    this Act; or 6        (2) the watercraft is owned by the person under 7    arrest, and the person under arrest gives permission to 8    another person to operate the watercraft, and the other 9    person would not, as determined by the arresting law 10    enforcement agency: (i) indicate a lack of ability to 11    operate a watercraft in a safe manner, or (ii) otherwise, 12    by operating the watercraft, be in violation of this Act.13(Source: P.A. 93-156, eff. 1-1-04.) 14    (625 ILCS 45/3-11)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 313-11)15    Sec. 3-11. Penalty. No person shall at any time: 16    (a) falsely alter or change in any manner a certificate of 17number issued under the provisions hereof; , or 18    (b) falsify any record required by this Act; ,19    (c) falsify information on any application to the 20Department that is required to be provided to the Department 21by this Act; or 22    (d) counterfeit any form of license provided for by this 23Act.24(Source: P.A. 100-469, eff. 6-1-18.)   HB3484- 9 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1    (625 ILCS 45/4-2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-2)2    Sec. 4-2. Navigation lights. 3    A. Watercraft subject to this Section shall be divided 4into classes as follows:5        1. Class 1: Less than 16 feet in length.6        2. Class 2: 16 feet or over and less than 26 feet in 7    length.8        3. Class 3: 26 feet or over and less than 40 feet in 9    length.10        4. Class 4: 40 feet or over and less than 65 feet in 11    length. 12    B. Every motorboat, underway from sunset to sunrise or 13underway in weather causing reduced visibility, shall carry 14and exhibit the following United States Coast Guard approved 15lights when underway and, during such time, shall not use any 16other lights that may be mistaken for or interfere with those 17prescribed as follows:18        1. A Class 1 or Class 2 motorboat shall carry the 19    following lights:20            (a) A bright white light aft to show all around the 21        horizon; and22            (b) A combined light in the fore part of the 23        watercraft and lower than the white light aft, showing 24        green to starboard and red to port, so fixed as to 25        throw the light from right ahead to 2 points (22.5 26        degrees) abaft the beam on their respective sides.  HB3484- 10 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1        2. A Class 3 or Class 4 motorboat shall carry the 2    following lights:3            (a) A bright white light in the fore part of the 4        watercraft as near the stern as practicable, so 5        constructed as to show the unbroken light over an arc 6        of the horizon of 20 points (225 degrees) of the 7        compass, so fixed as to throw the light 10 points 8        (112.5 degrees) on each side of the watercraft, 9        namely, from right ahead to 2 points (22.5 degrees) 10        abaft the beam on either side;11            (b) A bright white light aft, mounted higher than 12        the white light forward, to show all around the 13        horizon; and14            (c) On the starboard side, a green light so 15        constructed as to show an unbroken light over an arc of 16        the horizon of 10 points (112.5 degrees) of the 17        compass, so fixed as to throw the light from right 18        ahead to 2 points (22.5 degrees) abaft the beam on the 19        starboard side. On the port side, a red light so 20        constructed as to show an unbroken light over an arc of 21        the horizon of 10 points (112.5 degrees) of the 22        compass, so fixed as to throw the light from right 23        ahead to 2 points (22.5 degrees) abaft the beam on the 24        port side. The side lights shall be fitted with 25        inboard screens so set as to prevent these lights from 26        being seen across the bow.  HB3484- 11 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1        3. A Class 1 or Class 2 motorboat propelled by sail 2    alone shall exhibit the combined light prescribed by 3    paragraph (1) and a 12-point (135 degrees) white light 4    aft. A Class 3 or Class 4 motorboat, when so propelled, 5    shall exhibit the colored side lights, suitably screened 6    as prescribed by paragraph (2) and a 12-point (135 7    degrees) white light aft.8        4. Every white light prescribed by this Section shall 9    be of such character as to be visible at a distance of at 10    least 2 miles. Every colored light prescribed by this 11    Section shall be of such character as to be visible at a 12    distance of at least one mile. As used in this subsection 13    "visible", when applied to lights, means visible on a dark 14    night with clear atmosphere.15        5. If propelled by sail and machinery, a motorboat 16    shall carry the lights required by this Section for a 17    motorboat propelled by machinery only.18        6. All other watercraft over 65 feet in length and 19    those propelled solely by wind effect on the sail shall 20    display lights prescribed by federal regulations. 21    C. Nonpowered watercraft shall carry, ready at hand, a 22lantern or flashlight showing a white light that shall be 23exhibited in sufficient time to avert collision. Manually 24propelled watercraft used on the waters of this State where 25power-driven vessels are prohibited are exempt from the 26provisions of this Section.  HB3484- 12 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1    D. Any watercraft may carry and exhibit the lights 2required by the international regulations in lieu of the 3lights required by subsection B of this Section.4    E. All watercraft, when anchored, other than in a special 5anchorage area as defined in 33 CFR 109.10, shall, from sunset 6to sunrise, carry and display a steady white light visible all 7around the horizon for a distance of no less than 2 miles.8    F. The lights prescribed in this Section shall at minimum 9have an intensity so as to be visible at the minimum ranges as 10set forth in 33 CFR 83.22 (Blank).11    G. (Blank).12(Source: P.A. 102-595, eff. 6-1-22.) 13    (625 ILCS 45/4-4)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-4)14    Sec. 4-4. Whistles.) It is unlawful to operate a motorboat 15without a mouth, hand or power operated whistle, horn or other 16appliance, capable of producing a blast of 2 seconds or more 17duration and having an audible distance as set forth in 33 CFR 1886.01 for at least one-half mile. 19(Source: P.A. 82-783.) 20    (625 ILCS 45/4-11)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-11)21    Sec. 4-11. Engine cut-off switch. 22    (a) As used in this Section:23    "Engine cut-off switch link" means the lanyard or wireless 24cut-off device used to attach the motorboat operator to the   HB3484- 13 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1engine cut-off switch installed on the motorboat.2    "Engine cut-off switch" means an emergency switch 3installed on a motorboat that:4        (1) is designed to shut off the engine if:5                (A) the motorboat operator using a lanyard 6        attachment activates the switch by falling overboard 7        or otherwise moving beyond the length of the lanyard; 8        or9                (B) the motorboat operator or a passenger 10        using a wireless attachment activates the switch by 11        falling overboard and submerging a man-overboard 12        transmitter; and13            (2) attaches:14                (A) physically to the motorboat operator 15        through the use of a lanyard worn by the operator; or16                (B) wirelessly through the use of a 17        water-activated man-overboard transmitter worn by the 18        motorboat operator or any similarly equipped passenger 19        on the motorboat. means an operational emergency 20        cut-off engine stop switch installed on a motorboat 21        that attaches to a motorboat operator by an engine 22        cut-off switch link.23    (b) A motorboat operator may not operate a motorboat less 24than 26 feet in length that is equipped by the manufacturer 25with an engine cutoff switch and such switch is not in use 26while the motorboat is operating on plane or above   HB3484- 14 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1displacement speed. No person may operate a watercraft without 2first verifying that the engine cut-off switch is operational 3and fully functional and properly attaching the lanyard or 4wireless attachment, as appropriate for the specific 5motorboat, to the operator's body or to the clothing or 6personal flotation device being worn by the operator.7    (c) The requirement under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 8shall not apply if:9        (A) the main helm of the covered vessel is installed 10    within an enclosed cabin; or11        (B) the vessel does not have an engine cut-off switch. 12    No person may operate any motor boat, including personal 13    watercraft or specialty prop-craft, equipped with an 14    engine cut-off switch while the engine is running and the 15    motorboat is underway without verifying that the engine 16    cut-off switch is operational and fully-functional and:17        (1) the engine cut-off switch link is properly 18    attached to his or her person, clothing or worn PFD, as 19    appropriate for the specific vessel; or 20        (2) activating the wireless cut-off system. 21(Source: P.A. 96-1033, eff. 7-14-10.) 22    (625 ILCS 45/5-13)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 315-8)23    Sec. 5-13. Traffic rules. 24    A. The area straight ahead of a vessel to the point that is 2522.5 degrees beyond the middle of the vessel on the starboard   HB3484- 15 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1side of the watercraft shall be designated the danger zone. An 2operator of a watercraft shall yield the right-of-way to any 3other watercraft occupying or entering into the danger zone 4that may result in collision.5    A-5. Head-on situation.6        (1) If 2 power-driven vessels are meeting head-on or 7    nearly head-on courses so as to involve risk of collision, 8    each shall alter course to starboard so that each shall 9    pass on the port side of the other.10        (2) A vessel proceeding along the course of a narrow 11    channel or canal shall keep as near to the outer limit of 12    the channel or canal that lies on the starboard side as is 13    safe and practicable.14        (3) A power-driven vessel operating in narrow channels 15    and proceeding downbound with a following current 16    downstream shall have the right-of-way over an upbound 17    vessel, shall propose the manner and place of passage, and 18    shall imitate the maneuvering signals as required by law a 19    vessel proceeding upstream. The vessel proceeding upstream 20    shall yield as necessary to permit safe passing. 21    B. Crossing. As used in this Section, "crossing" means 2 22or more watercraft traveling in directions that would have the 23path of travel of the watercraft intersect each other.24        (1) If 2 power-driven vessels are crossing so as to 25    involve the risk of collision, the vessel that has the 26    other on the starboard side shall keep out of the way and   HB3484- 16 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1    shall avoid crossing ahead of the other vessel.2        (2) A power-driven vessel crossing a river shall keep 3    out of the way of a power-driven vessel ascending or 4    descending the river.5        (3) A vessel may not cross a narrow channel or canal if 6    the crossing impedes the passage of a vessel that can only 7    safely navigate within the channel or canal. 8    C. Overtaking.9        (1) A vessel overtaking any other shall give way to 10    the vessel being overtaken.11        (2) If a vessel operator is in doubt as to whether he 12    or she is overtaking another vessel, the operator shall 13    assume he or she is overtaking the other vessel and shall 14    act accordingly.15        (3) Any subsequent alteration of the bearing between 16    the 2 vessels shall not make the overtaking vessel a 17    crossing vessel within the meaning of this Section or 18    relieve the overtaking operator of the duty to keep clear 19    of the overtaken vessel until finally past and clear.20        (4) When overtaking in a narrow channel or canal, the 21    operator of a power-driven vessel intending to overtake 22    another power-driven vessel shall proceed to pass safety 23    only after indicating his or her intention by sounding the 24    horn as follows:25            (a) one short blast from the horn signifies a 26        request to pass on the overtaken vessel's starboard   HB3484- 17 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1        side;2            (b) 2 short blasts from the horn signify a request 3        to pass on the overtaken vessel's port side.4        (5) The operator of the power-driven vessel being 5    overtaken shall:6            (a) acknowledge the request by sounding the same 7        signal; or8            (b) sound 5 short blasts from the horn to indicate 9        danger or to warn the overtaking vessel not to pass.10        No response from the overtaken vessel shall be 11    interpreted as an indication of danger and is the same as 12    if 5 short blasts from the horn were sounded. In the 13    absence of an audible signal or horn, a light signal 14    device using the appropriate number of rapid bursts of 15    light may be used. 16    D. Sailing vessels. 17        (1) The operator of a power-driven vessel shall yield 18    the right-of-way to any nonpowered or sailing vessel 19    unless the nonpowered vessel is overtaking the 20    power-driven vessel or when a large craft is navigating in 21    a confined channel, the large craft has the right-of-way 22    over a boat propelled solely by oars or sails.23        (2) If 2 sailing vessels are approaching one another, 24    so as to involve risk of collision, one of them shall keep 25    out of the way of the other as follows:26            (a) If each has the wind on a different side, the   HB3484- 18 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1        vessel that has the wind on the port side shall give 2        way to the other vessel.3            (b) If both have the wind on the same side, the 4        vessel that is to windward shall give way to the vessel 5        that is to leeward.6            (c) If a vessel with the wind on the port side sees 7        a vessel to windward and cannot determine with 8        certainty whether the other vessel has the wind on the 9        port or starboard side, the vessel shall give way to 10        the other vessel. 11(Source: P.A. 102-595, eff. 6-1-22.) 12    (625 ILCS 45/5-18)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 315-13)13    Sec. 5-18. (a) No Beginning on January 1, 2016, no person 14born on or after January 1, 1998, unless exempted by 15subsection (i), shall operate a motorboat with over 10 horse 16power unless that person has a valid Boating Safety 17Certificate issued by the Department of Natural Resources or 18an entity or organization recognized and approved by the 19Department. 20    (b) No person under 10 years of age may operate a 21motorboat. 22    (c) Persons Prior to January 1, 2016, persons at least 10 23years of age and less than 12 years of age may operate a 24motorboat with over 10 horse power only if they are 25accompanied on the motorboat and under the direct control of a   HB3484- 19 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1parent or guardian or a person at least 18 years of age 2designated by a parent or guardian. Beginning on January 1, 32016, persons at least 10 years of age and less than 12 years 4of age may operate a motorboat with over 10 horse power only if 5the person is under the direct on-board supervision of a 6parent or guardian who meets the requirements of subsection 7(a) or a person at least 18 years of age who meets the 8requirements of subsection (a) and is designated by a parent 9or guardian. 10    (d) Persons Prior to January 1, 2016, persons at least 12 11years of age and less than 18 years of age may operate a 12motorboat with over 10 horse power only if they are 13accompanied on the motorboat and under the direct control of a 14parent or guardian or a person at least 18 years of age 15designated by a parent or guardian, or the motorboat operator 16is in possession of a Boating Safety Certificate issued by the 17Department of Natural Resources, Division of Law Enforcement, 18authorizing the holder to operate motorboats. Beginning on 19January 1, 2016, persons at least 12 years and less than 18 20years of age may operate a motorboat with over 10 horse power 21only if the person meets the requirements of subsection (a) or 22is under the direct on-board supervision of a parent or 23guardian who meets the requirements of subsection (a) or a 24person at least 18 years of age who meets the requirements of 25subsection (a) and is designated by a parent or guardian. 26    (e) The Beginning January 1, 2016, the owner of a   HB3484- 20 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1motorboat or a person given supervisory authority over a 2motorboat shall not permit a motorboat with over 10 horse 3power to be operated by a person who does not meet the Boating 4Safety Certificate requirements of this Section. 5    (f) Licensed boat liveries shall offer abbreviated 6operating and safety instruction covering core boat safety 7rules to all renters, unless the renter can demonstrate 8compliance with the Illinois Boating Safety Certificate 9requirements of this Section, or is exempt under subsection 10(i) of this Section. A person who completes abbreviated 11operating and safety instruction may operate a motorboat 12rented from the livery providing the abbreviated operating and 13safety instruction without having a Boating Safety Certificate 14for up to one year from the date of instruction. The Department 15shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. 16    (g) Violations. 17        (1) A person who is operating a motorboat with over 10 18    horse power and is required to have a valid Boating Safety 19    Certificate under the provisions of this Section shall 20    present the certificate to a law enforcement officer upon 21    request. Failure of the person to present the certificate 22    upon request is a petty offense. 23        (2) A person who provides false or fictitious 24    information in an application for a Boating Safety 25    Certificate; or who alters, forges, counterfeits, or 26    falsifies a Boating Safety Certificate; or who possesses a   HB3484- 21 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1    Boating Safety Certificate that has been altered, forged, 2    counterfeited, or falsified is guilty of a Class A 3    misdemeanor. 4        (3) A person who loans or permits his or her Boating 5    Safety Certificate to be used by another person or who 6    operates a motorboat with over 10 horse power using a 7    Boating Safety Certificate that has not been issued to 8    that person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. 9        (4) A violation of this Section done with the 10    knowledge of a parent or guardian shall be deemed a 11    violation by the parent or guardian and punishable under 12    Section 11A-1.13    (h) The Department of Natural Resources shall establish a 14program of instruction on boating safety, laws, regulations 15and administrative laws, and any other subject matter which 16might be related to the subject of general boat safety. The 17program shall be conducted by instructors certified by the 18Department of Natural Resources. The course of instruction for 19persons certified to teach boating safety shall be not less 20than 8 hours in length, and the Department shall have the 21authority to revoke the certification of any instructor who 22has demonstrated his inability to conduct courses on the 23subject matter. The Department of Natural Resources shall 24develop and provide a method for students to complete the 25program online. Students satisfactorily completing a program 26of not less than 8 hours in length shall receive a certificate   HB3484- 22 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1of safety from the Department of Natural Resources. The 2Department may cooperate with schools, online vendors, private 3clubs and other organizations in offering boating safety 4courses throughout the State of Illinois.5    The Department shall issue certificates of boating safety 6to persons 10 years of age or older successfully completing 7the prescribed course of instruction and passing such tests as 8may be prescribed by the Department. The Department may charge 9each person who enrolls in a course of instruction a fee not to 10exceed $5. If a fee is authorized by the Department, the 11Department shall authorize instructors conducting such courses 12meeting standards established by it to charge for the rental 13of facilities or for the cost of materials utilized in the 14course. Fees retained by the Department shall be utilized to 15defray a part of its expenses to operate the safety and 16accident reporting programs of the Department.17    (i) A Boating Safety Certificate is not required by: 18        (1) a person who possesses a valid United States Coast 19    Guard commercial vessel operator's license or a marine 20    certificate issued by the Canadian government; 21        (2) a person employed by the United States, this 22    State, another state, or a subdivision thereof while in 23    performance of his or her official duties; 24        (3) a person who is not a resident, is temporarily 25    using the waters of this State for a period not to exceed 26    90 days, and meets any applicable boating safety education   HB3484- 23 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1    requirements of his or her state of residency or possesses 2    a Canadian Pleasure Craft Operator's Card; 3        (4) a person who is a resident of this State who has 4    met the applicable boating safety education requirements 5    of another state or possesses a Canadian Pleasure Craft 6    Operator's Card; 7        (5) a person who has assumed operation of the 8    motorboat due to the illness or physical impairment of the 9    operator, and is returning the motorboat or personal 10    watercraft to shore in order to provide assistance or care 11    for that operator; 12        (6) a person who is registered as a commercial 13    fisherman or a person who is under the onboard direct 14    supervision of the commercial fisherman while operating 15    the commercial fisherman's vessel; 16        (7) a person who is serving or has qualified as a 17    surface warfare officer or enlisted surface warfare 18    specialist in the United States Navy; 19        (8) a person who has assumed operation of the 20    motorboat for the purpose of completing a watercraft 21    safety course approved by the Department, the U.S. Coast 22    Guard, or the National Association of State Boating Law 23    Administrators; 24        (9) a person using only an electric motor to propel 25    the motorboat;26        (10) a person operating a motorboat on private   HB3484- 24 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1    property; 2        (11) a person over the age of 12 years who holds a 3    valid certificate issued by another state, a province of 4    the Dominion of Canada, the United States Coast Guard 5    Auxiliary or the United States Power Squadron need not 6    obtain a certificate from the Department if the course 7    content of the program in such other state, province or 8    organization substantially meets that established by the 9    Department under this Section. A certificate issued by the 10    Department or by another state, province of the Dominion 11    of Canada or approved organization shall not constitute an 12    operator's license, but shall certify only that the 13    student has successfully passed a course in boating safety 14    instruction; or15        (12) a person who is temporarily using the waters of 16    this State for the purpose of participating in a boat 17    racing event sanctioned by the Department of Natural 18    Resources or authorized federal agency. The organizer or 19    holder of the sanctioned event shall possess liability 20    insurance for property damage and bodily injury or death 21    with a minimum benefit of $1,000,000 that shall remain in 22    effect through the entirety of the event. 23    (j) The Department of Natural Resources shall adopt rules 24necessary to implement this Section. The Department of Natural 25Resources shall consult and coordinate with the boating 26public, professional organizations for recreational boating   HB3484- 25 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1safety, and the boating retail, leasing, and dealer business 2community in the adoption of these rules. 3(Source: P.A. 98-698, eff. 1-1-15; 99-78, eff. 7-20-15; 499-526, eff. 7-8-16.) 5    (625 ILCS 45/5-24 new)6    Sec. 5-24. Possession of medical cannabis on a watercraft.7    (a) No operator, who is a medical cannabis cardholder, may 8use medical cannabis within the passenger area of any 9watercraft upon waters in this State.10    (b) No operator, who is a medical cannabis cardholder, a 11medical cannabis designated caregiver, medical cannabis 12cultivation center agent, or dispensing organization agent may 13possess medical cannabis within any area of any watercraft 14upon waters in this State except in a secured, sealed or 15resealable, odor-proof, and child-resistant medical cannabis 16container that is inaccessible.17    (c) No passenger, who is a medical cannabis card holder, a 18medical cannabis designated caregiver, or medical cannabis 19dispensing organization agent may possess medical cannabis 20within any passenger area of any watercraft upon waters in 21this State except in a secured, sealed or resealable, 22odor-proof, and child-resistant medical cannabis container 23that is inaccessible.24    (d) Any person who violates subsections (a) through (c):25        (1) commits a Class A misdemeanor;  HB3484- 26 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1        (2) shall be subject to revocation of his or her 2    medical cannabis card for 2 years from the end of the 3    sentence imposed; and4        (3) shall be subject to revocation of his or her 5    status as a medical cannabis caregiver, medical cannabis 6    cultivation center agent, or medical cannabis dispensing 7    organization agent for 2 years from the end of the 8    sentence imposed. 9    (625 ILCS 45/5-25 new)10    Sec. 5-25. Possession of adult use cannabis on a 11watercraft.12    (a) No operator may use cannabis within the passenger area 13of any watercraft upon waters in this State.14    (b) No operator may possess cannabis within any area of 15any watercraft upon waters in this State except in a secured, 16sealed or resealable, odor-proof, child-resistant cannabis 17container that is inaccessible.18    (c) No passenger may possess cannabis within any passenger 19area of any watercraft upon waters in this State except in a 20secured, sealed or resealable, odor-proof, child-resistant 21cannabis container that is inaccessible.22    (d) Any person who knowingly violates subsection (a), (b), 23or (c) commits a Class A misdemeanor. 24    (625 ILCS 45/7-1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 317-1)  HB3484- 27 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1    Sec. 7-1. It On and after March 1, 1960 it shall be 2unlawful for any person to engage in the business of operating 3a boat or boats carrying passengers for hire, or renting a boat 4or boats for hire without first having obtained a license so to 5do from the Department. Such license shall be renewable each 6year on January March 1st, shall be good only for one year or 7portion of a year up to and including December 31st March 1st, 8and it shall be unlawful for such person to so engage in such 9business without having a valid license currently then in 10force. The Department shall outline the application process 11for passenger-for-hire licenses or rental boat licenses by 12administrative rule. Violations of this Act by a business or 13individual holding a rental license or passenger-for-hire 14license shall result in the suspension or revocation of the 15license issued based on the procedures outlined in 16administrative rule. 17(Source: P.A. 85-149.) 18    (625 ILCS 45/7-2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 317-2)19    Sec. 7-2. License fee. The fee for a license to operate a 20boat for carrying passengers for hire shall be established by 21administrative rule $50 for each boat. The fee for a license 22for engaging in the business of renting boats for hire and the 23shall be $30, plus an annual fee for each boat rented or 24offered for rent shall be set by administrative rule of $1 for 25each boat less than 16 feet in length; $2 for each boat 16 feet   HB3484- 28 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1or over and less than 26 feet in length; and $8 for each boat 226 feet or over in length. No boat shall, after March 1, 1960, 3be rented or offered for rent until such license has been 4granted and the boat marked as hereinafter provided.5(Source: P.A. 85-149.)  HB3484- 29 -LRB104 12161 LNS 22262 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    625 ILCS 45/1-2from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 311-24    625 ILCS 45/2-2from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 312-25    625 ILCS 45/3-11from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 313-116    625 ILCS 45/4-2from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-27    625 ILCS 45/4-4from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-48    625 ILCS 45/4-11from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-119    625 ILCS 45/5-13from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 315-810    625 ILCS 45/5-18from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 315-1311    625 ILCS 45/5-24 new12    625 ILCS 45/5-25 new13    625 ILCS 45/7-1from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 317-114    625 ILCS 45/7-2from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 317-2